North Carolina, session 2025, HB1006.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 21 of Article II of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 21. Style and content of the acts.
The style of the acts shall be: "The General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:". Each act
shall contain but one subject, which shall be clearly expressed in its title, except general
appropriation acts, revenue acts, and acts containing only technical corrections."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that time.
The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment limiting the number of subjects that can be in a bill to one,
except for appropriations bills, tax bills, and technical corrections bills."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*H1006-v-1*